Texas statutes.
LABOR CODE

TITLE 3. EMPLOYER-EMPLOYEE RELATIONS

CHAPTER 104A. REPORTING WORKPLACE VIOLENCE

Sec. 104A.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Commission" means the Texas Workforce Commission.

(2) "Employee" means an individual who is employed by an employer for compensation.

(3) "Employer" means a person who employs one or more employees.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 904 (H.B. 915), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 104A.002. NOTICE BY EMPLOYER. Each employer shall post a notice to employees of the contact information for reporting instances of workplace violence or suspicious activity to the Department of Public Safety. The notice must be posted:

(1) in a conspicuous place in the employer's place of business;

(2) in sufficient locations to be convenient to all employees; and

(3) in English and Spanish, as appropriate.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 904 (H.B. 915), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 104A.003. RULES. The commission, in consultation with the Department of Public Safety, by rule shall prescribe the form and content of the notice required by this section. The rules must require that the notice:

(1) contain the contact information for reporting instances of workplace violence or suspicious activity to the Department of Public Safety; and

(2) inform employees of the right to make a report to the Department of Public Safety anonymously.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 904 (H.B. 915), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.